Virginia statutes. Title 3.2. Agriculture, Animal Care, and Food.
Article 5. Violations and Penalties.

§ 3.2-6043.
Violations; criminal penalties.

It is unlawful for any person to violate any of the (i) provisions of this chapter or (ii) regulations adopted or quarantines established under this chapter. Any person who violates such provisions or regulations is guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.

It is unlawful for any person to fail to allow the State Veterinarian or his representative to perform any duty required of him pursuant to this chapter. Any person who fails to allow the State Veterinarian or his representative to perform any duty required of him pursuant this chapter is guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.

In addition to the penalties provided in subsections A and B, each day of violation of any provision of Article 3 (§

3.2-6031

et seq.) shall constitute a separate offense.

History.

2016, c. 563.

§ 3.2-6044.
Civil penalty.

Except as provided in §

3.2-6023

, in lieu of any criminal penalty established pursuant to §

3.2-6043

, the Board may assess a civil penalty in an amount not to exceed $1,000 per violation. In determining the amount of any civil penalty, the Board shall give due consideration to the (i) history of the person’s previous violations, (ii) seriousness of the violation, and (iii) demonstrated good faith of the person charged in attempting to achieve compliance with this chapter after notification of the violation. Such civil penalties shall be deposited into the Livestock and Poultry Disease Fund established in §

3.2-6045

. The provisions of this section shall not apply to §

3.2-6023

.

History.

2016, c. 563.

§ 3.2-6045.
Livestock and Poultry Disease Fund.

There is hereby created in the state treasury a special nonreverting fund to be known as the Livestock and Poultry Disease Fund, referred to in this section as “the Fund.” The Fund shall be established on the books of the Comptroller. All civil penalties assessed pursuant to this chapter shall be paid into the state treasury and credited to the Fund. Interest earned on moneys in the Fund shall remain in the Fund and be credited to it. Any moneys remaining in the Fund, including interest thereon, at the end of each fiscal year shall not revert to the general fund but shall remain in the Fund. Moneys in the Fund shall be used to carry out the purposes of this chapter. Expenditures and disbursements from the Fund shall be made by the State Treasurer on warrants issued by the Comptroller upon written request signed by the Commissioner.

History.

2016, c. 563.